Massachusetts, session 194th, S662.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 21A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 2A the following section:-
Section 2B. (a) There shall be established within the office the drought management task
force. The secretary and the director of the Massachusetts emergency management agency shall
appoint to the task force officials from state agencies and professional organizations with
responsibility for areas likely to be affected by drought conditions; representatives of agencies
that provide data used to assess drought conditions or that have the ability to respond to drought
conditions; and public health and safety and environmental professionals, and may invite
officials from federal agencies to participate. The secretary and the director shall have joint
responsibility for coordinating the task force. The task force shall meet at least quarterly, but it
of 2

shall meet at least monthly during drought. The task force shall be staffed by a director appointed
by the secretary.
(b) The task force shall assist in collecting and assessing technical information,
facilitating coordination and communication among task force members, agencies and the public,
and provide recommendations to the secretary, the secretary of public safety and security and the
governor on the level of drought and responses thereto. The task force shall also make
recommendations for the end of drought, or reduction of the drought level.
(c) The secretary may order water conservation measures, including limits on
nonessential outdoor water use, based on the severity of drought in drought regions to protect
public health, safety or the environment. Such water conservation measures by the secretary shall
apply uniformly to all water users within a drought region.
(d) Notwithstanding section 27C of chapter 29 of the General Laws or any ordinance, by-
law, rule or regulation to the contrary, cities and towns shall enforce, water conservation
restrictions issued by the secretary to the fullest extent permitted by law.
of 2